District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Public Infrastructure Notice Modernization Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Comprehensive Bicycle Transportation and Safety Act
of 1984, effective March 16, 1985 (D.C. Law 5-179; D.C. Official Code § 50-1601 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new section 4a to read as follows:
“Sec. 4a. Community engagement and public comment.
“(a)(1) At least 60 days before construction begins on a protected bicycle lane, cycle
track, transit lane, or multimodal priority street (“project”), the Department shall provide notice
that shall include:
“(A) A statement of intent to construct a new project, including the
proposed design;

“(B) A statement describing a 60-day period for public comment on the
proposed project, and how affected parties can comment and Advisory Neighborhood
Commissions can submit resolutions on the potential impact of the proposed project;
“(C) An expected construction schedule; and
“(D) Notice of the public hearing required by subsection (b)(3) of this
section.
“(2) The notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be transmitted
via:
“(A) Electronic mail to the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions
(“ANCs”), all councilmembers, and impacted groups affected by the project; and
“(B) Certified mail or hand-delivery on the proposed route to impacted
neighbors.
“(3)(A) At least 30 days before construction begins on a project, and within the
60-day public comment period, the Department shall hold a public hearing at an accessible
evening or weekend time and in an accessible location in the vicinity of the proposed route.
“(B) At least 15 days before the public hearing, the Department shall
provide notice of this hearing by posting written notice in public buildings including libraries,
recreation centers, senior centers, and along the proposed route, and by placing a notice in the
District of Columbia Register.
“(b) A resolution of an affected ANC shall be given great weight, as described in section
13(d)(3)(A) of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective March 26, 1976
(D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.10(d)(3)(A)).

“(c) The Mayor shall maintain for public review all records, including the notice provided
to impacted neighbors and groups, notice of the public hearing, records from the public hearing,
comments from affected parties received pursuant to sub-paragraph (a)(1)(B) of this section and
responses thereto, and any other information about the project.
“(d) The Department shall make a determination of whether design changes are required
within 21 days of the closure of the public comment period and provide notice, which shall be
communicated in accordance with the requirements of subsection (a)(2) of this section.
“(e) If the Department determines that the design of the project should be changed
significantly after the public comment period, the Department shall initiate a second period of
public comment prior to beginning construction.
“(f) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Department” means the District Department of Transportation.
“(2) “Impacted neighbors” means residents whose street address is either on the
street or on a street directly perpendicular to the street on which construction will take place.
“(3) “Impacted groups” means a school, place of worship, business, nonprofit
organization, or other group whose street address is either on the street or on a street directly
perpendicular to the street on which construction will take place.
“(4) “Changed significantly” means a material modification to the design of a
project that alters the project’s function, use, or impacts, and that was not subject to public
comment during the initial public comment period.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.

The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).